src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! Main development by Joshua Wilbur (joshua.wilbur@ut.ee)



! ========== !
! Inflection !
! ========== !

!juollkie+N+Abe             morf =======%> upper
!juollkie^WG%>htahk   trans
!                                     
!juollkie^WG%>Abehtahk   mphon
!juol0kie00htahk         trans ======%> lower

! Noun 
! ===============


! even-syllabic
! -------------

LEXICON N_EVEN ! giella, guolle, bissti
+N: EVENCASE ;  ! Sg Nom, Ess
+N: N_EVEN_ILL ;
+N:^WG N_EVEN_WK ; ! CG here
+N: N_EVEN_DIM ; !DIM derivation
!+N: PX ; !possessive suffixes

LEXICON N_EVEN_O ! rássjo-variant rässjuj
+N: EVENCASE ;  ! Sg Nom, Ess
+N: N_EVEN_ILL ; 
+N: N_EVEN_ILL_O ; ! allows rássjo-variant: rässjuj
+N:^WG N_EVEN_WK ; ! CG here
+N: N_EVEN_O_DIM ; !DIM derivation

LEXICON N_EVEN_NOCG ! without consonant gradation, e.g. bägga<->biegga
+N:^G3 EVENCASE ;
+N:^G3 N_EVEN_ILL ;
+N:^WG N_EVEN_WK ; !
+N: N_EVEN_DIM ; !DIM derivation

LEXICON N_EVEN_NOALT ! without any stem alternation (no C-grad, no umlaut); loan words with -iehka
+N: EVENCASE ;
+N: N_EVEN_ILL ;
+N: N_EVEN_WK ; !
+N: N_EVEN_DIM ; !DIM derivation



LEXICON EVENCASE
+Sg+Nom:^UAUML%>    K ;
N_EVEN_ESS ; ! Essive
+Cmp/SgNom:^UAUML R ; !compound element in strong-grade
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG R ; !compound element in weak-grade

LEXICON N_EVEN_ILL
+Sg+Ill:%>j^V2E2AA K ; !V2 e->á in ill.sg, dim

LEXICON N_EVEN_ILL_O
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>j^V2O2U K ; !V2 o->u in ill.sg

LEXICON N_EVEN_ESS
+Ess:^UAUML%>n K ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_WK
+Sg+Gen:  K ;
+Sg+Acc:%>v  K ;
+Sg+Ine:%>n K ;
+Sg+Ela:%>st K ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:%>s K ; !dialectal variant, but not standard
+Abe:%>dak K ; ! Norm
!+Abe:%>htaka K ; ! Informants S and Bj 
!+Abe:%>htak K ; ! Informants S and Bj 
+Pl+Nom:  K ;
:^IJ%>j N_EVEN_J ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_J
+Pl+Gen:    K ;
+Pl+Acc:t   K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:d   K ;
+Pl+Ine:n   K ;
+Pl+Ela:st  K ; !norm
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:s  K ;
+Pl+Ill:da  K ; 
+Pl+Com:    K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:gum K ;
+Sg+Com:n K ;         !norm
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:na K ; !variant


LEXICON N_EVEN4 !mánnodak<->mánnodag-
+N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
+N:a N_EVEN4_DEFAULT ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:%> R ; !compound element
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a R ; !compound element !not sure this is real


LEXICON N_EVEN4_ISA !guoksagis<->guoksagas-
+N+Sg+Nom:i2s%> K ;
+N:asa N_EVEN4_DEFAULT ;

LEXICON N_EVEN4_ASA !mujjtulas<->mujjtulas-
+N+Sg+Nom:as%> K ;
+N:asa N_EVEN4_DEFAULT ;

LEXICON N_EVEN4_TJ !såbmelatj<->såbmelatja- (variant såbmeladtja-)
+N+Sg+Nom:tj%> K ;
+N:tja N_EVEN4_DEFAULT ;
+N+Use/NG:dtja N_EVEN4_DEFAULT ;

LEXICON N_EVEN4_DEFAULT ! from previous step, plus allows ADJs to dock here
+Sg+Acc:%>v K ;
+Sg+Gen:%> K ;
+Sg+Ill:%>j K ;
+Sg+Ine:%>n K ;
+Sg+Ela:%>st K ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:%>s K ;
+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:%>jna K ;
+Ess:%>n K ;
!+Abe:%>dak K ; ! XXX
+Pl+Nom:%> K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>jt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>jd K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>j K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:%>jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:%>jst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:%>js K ;
+Pl+Com:%>j K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:%>jgum K ;
: N_EVEN_DIM ; !DIM derivation


LEXICON N_EVEN_DIM ! guolla->guolatj; guolle->guolátj; mánnodak->mánnodagatj
+Der/Dimin+N:^WG%>tj^V2E2AA N_DIM_s2 ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_O_DIM !gárrvo->gärvutj
+Der/Dimin+N:^WG%>tj^V2O2U N_DIM_s2 ;

LEXICON N_JUHAAN ! Juhán, Juhána- (special N-class for loan (proper-)nouns that have unusual morphophonology (always -a- as V3))
+N+Sg+Nom:^UAUML%>    K ;
+N:a N_EVEN_ESS ; ! Essive
+N:a N_EVEN_ILL ;
+N:a^WG N_EVEN_WK ; ! CG here
+N:a N_EVEN_DIM ; !DIM derivation


!LEXICON N_EVEN4_VSA !guoksagis<->guoksagas-, mujjtulas<->mujjtulas-
!+Sg+Acc:asa%>v K ;
!+Sg+Gen:asa%> K ;
!+Sg+Ill:asa%>j K ;
!+Sg+Ine:asa%>n K ;
!+Sg+Ela:asa%>st K ;
!+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:asa%>s K ;
!+Sg+Com:asa%>jn K ;
!+Sg+Com+Use/NG:asa%>jna K ;
!+Ess:asa%>n K ; 
!!+Abe:asa%>dak K ; ! XXX
!+Pl+Nom:asa%> K ;
!+Pl+Acc:asa%>jd K ;
!+Pl+Gen:asa%>j K ;
!+Pl+Ill:asa%>jda K ;
!+Pl+Ine:asa%>jn K ;
!+Pl+Ela:asa%>jst K ;
!+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:asa%>js K ;
!+Pl+Com:asa%>j K ;
!+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:asa%>jgum K ;





! odd-syllabic
! ------------

LEXICON N_ODD !standard odd-syllable noun, eg. guohtom<->guohtom-
+N+Sg+Nom:%> K ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: R ; !compound element
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:a R ; !compound element; not sure how it works: biednagbärrgo???
+N: N_ODD_X ;
+N: N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM

LEXICON N_ODD_WG !standard odd-syllable noun with CGrad, eg. vanas<->vadnas-
+N: N_ODD_WG_s2 ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG R ; !compound element
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:a R ; !compound element !not sure!

LEXICON N_ODD_WG_s2 !allows ADJ to dock here
+Sg+Nom:^WG%> K ;
N_ODD_X ;
N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM

LEXICON N_ODD_OPEN !open-syllable, eg. biena<->biednag-, låvdå<->låvvdåk-
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG^CDEL%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^CDEL R ; !compound element in weak-grade, no final C
!+N+Cmp/SgGen: R ; !compound element in weak-grade, no final C ! not sure about this
+N: N_ODD_X ;
+N: N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM

LEXICON N_ODD_VH !odd-syllable with VH, eg. ålol->ullul- 
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG%> K ;
+N:^V2O2U N_ODD_X ;
+N:^V2O2U N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM

LEXICON N_ODD_V2E2AA !odd-syllable with change in V2 from E to Á, eg. åres->årrás-; ALWAYS followed by -s- or -r-
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG%> K ;
+N:^V2E2AA N_ODD_X ;
+N:^V2E2AA N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM

LEXICON N_ODD_V2E2AA_G3 !odd-syllable with change in V2 from E to Á without C-gradation, eg. vähttjer->vähttjára-; ALWAYS followed by -s- or -r-
+N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
+N:^V2E2AA N_ODD_X ;
+N:^V2E2AA N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM

LEXICON N_ODD_noCG_G3 !odd-syllable noun III-II but without CGrad, eg. guobbar<->guabbar-
+N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
+N:^G3^UAUML N_ODD_X ;
!+N+Cmp/SgNom: R ; !compound element !not sure!
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:a R ; !compound element !not sure!

LEXICON N_ODD_noCG_G3_OPEN !open odd-syllable noun III-II but without CGrad, eg. vuodda<->vuaddag-
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG^CDEL%> K ;
+N:^G3^UAUML N_ODD_X ;
!+N+Cmp/SgNom: R ; !compound element !not sure!
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:a R ; !compound element !not sure!

!LEXICON N_ODD_WG_aH !odd-syllable noun with CGrad, nom.sg ends in -a, extension in -ah-, eg. ruma<->rubmah-
!+N+Sg+Nom:a^WG%> K ;
!+N:ah N_ODD_X ;
!!+N: N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM !CHECK!

LEXICON N_ODD_WG_eH !odd-syllable noun with CGrad, nom.sg ends in -e, extension in -ih-, eg. gane<->gidnih-
+N+Sg+Nom:e^WG%> K ;
+N:ih N_ODD_X ;
!+N: N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM !CHECK!

LEXICON N_ODD_WG_oH !odd-syllable noun with CGrad, nom.sg ends in -o, extension in -uh-, eg. njuono<->njunnuh-
+N+Sg+Nom:o^WG%> K ;
+N:uh N_ODD_X ;
!+N: N_ODD_DIM ; !link to DIM !CHECK!

LEXICON N_ODD_X !N_ODD suffixes (X as in suffiX)
+Sg+Acc:a%>v K ;
+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
+Sg+Ill:i2%>j K ;
+Sg+Ine:i2%>n K ;
+Sg+Ela:i2%>st K ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:i2%>s K ;
+Sg+Com:i2%>jn K ;
+Ess:i2%>n K ;

!+Ess+Use/NG:^CDEL%>n K ; 
!!needs to delete the final C of the stem! 
!!but shouldn't apply to DIM-forms (currently just adds -n, without V before!)

+Abe:a%>htá K ;
+Pl+Nom:a%> K ;
+Pl+Acc:i2%>jt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:i2%>jd K ;
+Pl+Gen:i2%>j K ;
+Pl+Ill:i2%>jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:i2%>jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:i2%>jst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:i2%>js K ;
+Pl+Com:i2%>j K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:i2%>jgum K ;
