src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
dirvitjmuorra:dirvitj#mu^Orra N_EVEN "tar wood" ; ! no. 3953
hiŋŋu:hiŋ'ŋu N_EVEN "long-tailed duck" ; ! no. 91366
mäjjsa:miejjsa N_EVEN "external frame backpack" ; ! no. 4994
skråvvá:skråvvá N_EVEN "muzzle, gag" ; ! no. 3632
tällta:tiellta N_EVEN "tent" ; ! no. 91307
bujjdudak:bujjdudag2 N_EVEN4 "obesity" ; ! no. 4057
gáskaldak:gáskaldag2 N_EVEN4 "bite" ; ! no. 3278
gåbbátjak:gåbbátjag2 N_EVEN4 "both" ; ! no. 723
lávvodak:lávvodag2 N_EVEN4 "Saturday" ; ! no. 1027
sågástak:sågástag2 N_EVEN4 "dense birch forest" ; ! no. 6868
iehkedisråhkålvas:iehkedis#råhkålv N_EVEN4_ASA "evening prayer" ; ! no. 3076
jugalvas:jugalv N_EVEN4_ASA "wedding" ; ! no. 3461
lävvludas:lä2vvlud N_EVEN4_ASA "song" ; ! no. 5857
råhkålvas:råhkålv N_EVEN4_ASA "church service" ; ! no. 1456
vuojŋanis+Use/NG:vu^Ojŋan N_EVEN4_ASA "spirit; brain, mind" ; ! no. 2167
bätsidis:bä2tsid N_EVEN4_ISA "relict, remain" ; ! no. 90536
gålmådis:gålmåd N_EVEN4_ISA "third (fraction)" ; ! no. 4172
náranis:náran N_EVEN4_ISA "abscess, boil" ; ! no. 1245
tjåmodis:tjåmod N_EVEN4_ISA "a reindeer’s shoulder" ; ! no. 2883
vágodis+Use/NG:vä2gud N_EVEN4_ISA "admonishment" ; ! no. 90919
ássjálatj:ássjála N_EVEN4_TJ "criminal" ; ! no. 5263
färrtahatj:fä2rrtaha N_EVEN4_TJ "each and every" ; ! no. 91522
såbmelatj:såbmela N_EVEN4_TJ "Finn" ; ! no. 1761
ärbulatj:ä2rbula N_EVEN4_TJ "heir" ; ! no. 2731
apotiehka:apotiehka N_EVEN_NOALT "pharmacy" ; ! no. 91606
bibliotiehka:bibliotiehka N_EVEN_NOALT "library" ; ! no. 3308
minoritiehta:minoritiehta N_EVEN_NOALT "minority" ; ! no. 5983
planiehta:planiehta N_EVEN_NOALT "planet" ; ! no. 91608
universitiehta:universitiehta N_EVEN_NOALT "university" ; ! no. 5503
bäbbmobárdne:bäbbmo#bárdne N_EVEN_NOCG "foster son" ; ! no. 6025
gadtsa:gadtsa N_EVEN_NOCG "fingernail, claw" ; ! no. 488
libba:libba N_EVEN_NOCG "lamb" ; ! no. 2757
rátkamsåbbe:rátkam#såbbe N_EVEN_NOCG "stick used to divide up reindeer" ; ! no. 91064
tjidtje:tjidtje N_EVEN_NOCG "mother" ; ! no. 3618
birrso:birrso N_EVEN_O "gun, rifle" ; ! no. 189
fáddno:fáddno N_EVEN_O "garden angelica" ; ! no. 4450
jåvvlåbäbbmo:jåvvlå#biebbmo N_EVEN_O "Christmas food" ; ! no. 90856
råhto:råhto N_EVEN_O "willow shrub" ; ! no. 1457
tjajbmo:tjajbmo N_EVEN_O "laughter" ; ! no. 90361
dállveårroj:dállve#årroj N_ODD "reindeer which remained behind during the winter instead of migrating" ; ! no. 4722
guoddalm:gu^Oddalm N_ODD "messenger, omen" ; ! no. 6562
riebak:riebag2 N_ODD "meat which was ruined by too much heat during smoking" ; ! no. 90301
vahák:vahág2 N_ODD "injury, damage" ; ! no. 5475
garrásgiera:garrás#gierrag N_ODD_OPEN "bronchus" ; ! no. 3415
gäjbmebiena:gäjbme#biednag N_ODD_OPEN "female dog in heat" ; ! no. 3489
rijbmomuohta:rijbmo#mu^Ohttag N_ODD_OPEN "heavy snowfall" ; ! no. 1409
tjårå:tjårråg N_ODD_OPEN "group of reindeer" ; ! no. 90924
garber:garber N_ODD_V2E2AA "unripe berry" ; ! no. 90542
guoktes:gu^Okktes N_ODD_V2E2AA "twosome" ; ! no. 90200
máles:málles N_ODD_V2E2AA "hot meal, dinner" ; ! no. 90270
sáddebáhper:sádde#báhpper N_ODD_V2E2AA "sandpaper" ; ! no. 1468
gahper:gahper N_ODD_V2E2AA_G3 "cap (part of traditional dress)" ; ! no. 6765
guähpper:gu^Ohpper N_ODD_V2E2AA_G3 "hoof" ; ! no. 684
vähttjer:vä2httjer N_ODD_V2E2AA_G3 "hammer" ; ! no. 2106
jugos:juhkos N_ODD_VH "drink, beverage" ; ! no. 3458
sjlåtjos:sjlåhtjos N_ODD_VH "diarrhea" ; ! no. 91302
tjálos:tjállos N_ODD_VH "written text" ; ! no. 90369
vijor:vidjor N_ODD_VH "order, context" ; ! no. 2126
duodjebarrgej:duodje#barrgej N_ODD_WG "artesian" ; ! no. 5686
gillar:gil'lar N_ODD_WG "trap" ; ! no. 4628
njuoktjam:nju^Okktjam N_ODD_WG "tongue, clapper in a reindeer bell" ; ! no. 1296
svájnas:svájdnas N_ODD_WG "male servant, assistant" ; ! no. 1791
gane:gadn N_ODD_WG_eH "invisible subterranean being" ; ! no. 6873
riebe:riehp N_ODD_WG_eH "red fox" ; ! no. 2790
njuono:nju^Onn N_ODD_WG_oH "the front of a reindeer herd" ; ! no. 90810
åvlo:åvvl N_ODD_WG_oH "meltwater pool on the ground" ; ! no. 90372
guobbar:gu^Obbar N_ODD_noCG_G3 "mushroom" ; ! no. 679
luobbal:lu^Obbal N_ODD_noCG_G3 "calm water, wide place in a stream" ; ! no. 3919
vieddar:vieddar N_ODD_noCG_G3 "wide sandbank" ; ! no. 2727
sjnjierákvuodda:sjnjierák#vu^Oddag N_ODD_noCG_G3_OPEN "multicolor woven shoestrap for men" ; ! no. 5406
vuodda:vu^Oddag N_ODD_noCG_G3_OPEN "shoestrap (for holding up Saami footwear)" ; ! no. 2150
